Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7927.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-17.29-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-17.29 entitled
"Electronic Monitoring in Nursing and Assisted Living Facilities" is hereby amended to read as
follows:
23-17.29-7. Costs and installation.
(a) A resident or resident representative choosing to conduct electronic monitoring shall do
so at the resident’s own expense, including the purchase, installation, maintenance, and removal
costs.
(b) Any device used by a resident to conduct authorized electronic monitoring shall meet
the following minimum functional requirements:
(1) Include timestamping of all video recordings; and
(2) If movement tracking is a default setting, that the device must be able to switch off this
function.
(c) If a resident chooses to place an electronic monitoring device that uses internet
technology for visual or audio monitoring, the resident shall be responsible for contracting with an
internet service provider except that in the event the facility provides internet access to the residents,
then the resident may connect the electronic monitoring device to the facility's internet service for
use with said service without incurring extra cost or charges.
(d) All electronic monitoring device installations and supporting services shall be UL-

listed.
(e) The electronic monitoring device must be placed in a conspicuously visible location in
the room.
(f) A facility shall not charge the resident a fee for the cost of electricity used by an
electronic monitoring device.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005763
========
LC005763 - Page 2 of 3